Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7201 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Each state agency, board, commission, department, or other
entity organized within the executive department shall include on
any of its forms as described by subsection B of this section a link
to the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs or similar method in
order to allow a person making payment to such governmental entity
to make a donation to the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs
Revolving Fund.
B. The provisions of this section shall include, but shall not
be limited to:
1. Driver license applications;
2. Motor vehicle registrations and renewals;
3. Fishing and hunting license applications;

4. Income tax forms; and
5. Any other transaction during which an executive agency
issues a license or utilizes a form that could contain the
information prescribed by subsection A of this section.
C. If payment for any item or service described in this section
can be made through a website owned or maintained on behalf of the
governmental entity, the website shall have a conspicuous area which
clearly indicates that the payor may utilize the website to make a
donation to the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs Revolving
Fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3078 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 18th day of February,
2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3078 Page 3